Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Chapter 26. Invasive Species Council.

§§ 10.1-2600 through 10.1-2609.

Expired.

Editor’s note.

This chapter, former §§

10.1-2600

through 10.1-2609, which established the Invasive Species Council, was enacted by Acts 2003, c. 433. This chapter expired by the terms of Acts 2003, c. 433, cl. 2, on July 1, 2006.